Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1466
Dissolved candidate committee; unexpended funds; how treated.

Any person, who after being a candidate for office dissolves the candidate committee as provided in section 49-1453, may transfer any unexpended funds from such committee to another candidate committee, a political party committee, or a tax-exempt charitable institution or may return such unexpended funds to the contributors of the funds upon dissolution of the candidate committee.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 66;

Laws 2000, LB 438, § 8.